Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-1246
Fireworks; sale; license required; fees.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, hold for sale, or offer for sale as a distributor, jobber, or retailer any fireworks in this state unless such person has first obtained a license as a distributor, jobber, or retailer. Application for each such license shall be made to the State Fire Marshal on forms prescribed by him or her. Each application shall be accompanied by the required fee, which shall be one thousand dollars for a distributor's license, four hundred dollars for a jobber's license, and one hundred dollars for a retailer's license. Each application for a retailer's license shall be received by the State Fire Marshal at least ten business days prior to the sales period, as set forth in section 28-1249, in which the retailer wishes to sell consumer fireworks. A retailer's license shall be good only for the specific sales period listed on the application and within the calendar year in which issued. The retailer's license shall at all times be displayed at the place of business of the holder thereof.

(2) The funds received pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Fire Marshal Cash Fund.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 278;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 22;

Laws 1986, LB 853, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 251, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 83;

Laws 2010, LB880, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB805, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB434, § 2.